Hawaii statutes.
§11-93 Voting units. Immediately after
the close of registration of voters preceding any election, the chief election
officer shall establish one or more voting units in each precinct polling
place. All voting units shall be in the same precinct polling place. In a
precinct having more than one voting unit the chief election officer or the
officer's authorized representative shall designate each unit by a uniform
identification system. The clerk in preparing the list of registered voters
shall divide the list, on an alphabetical basis, as equal as possible between
or among the voting units. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1979, c 133, §3; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next